Missouri, session 2026, HB1678.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 315.005, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 315.005 and 315.085, to read as follows:
315.005. As used in sections 315.005 to 315.065, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Code", the standards relating to fire safety, sanitation, electrical wiring, fuel-
burning appliances, plumbing, swimming pools and spas, sewage and waste treatment and
disposal as adopted by the department. The department in its discretion, may incorporate, in
whole or in part, the standards or codes promulgated by the National Fire Protection
Association, Building Officials and Code Administration International, Inc., Great Lakes
Upper Mississippi River Board of State Sanitary Engineers, and American Society of Sanitary
Engineers;
(2) "Department", the director of the department of health and senior services or an
agent of the director of the department of health and senior services;
(3) "Guest room", any room or unit where sleeping accommodations are regularly
furnished to the public;
(4) "Hosting platform", an electronic platform used by a rental operator to
advertise or facilitate the rental of a short-term rental;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1678 2
(5) "Human trafficking", the use of force, fraud, or coercion to obtain some type
of labor or commercial sex act as defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 7102 and the commission
of an offense established under sections 566.200 to 566.223;
(6) "Human trafficking awareness training", training established or approved
by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following components:
(a) The definition of human trafficking and commercial exploitation of children;
(b) Guidance on how to identify persons at risk for trafficking;
(c) Guidance on how to identify the signs of trafficking and persons potentially
engaged in the act of trafficking;
(d) Differences between labor and sex trafficking, specific to the hotel sector;
(e) Guidance on the role of hospitality employees in reporting and responding to
instances of human trafficking; and
(f) Contact information for the national human trafficking hotline toll-free
number and text line and contact information for the local law enforcement agency.
(7) "Lodging establishment", any building, group of buildings, structure, facility,
place, or places of business where five or more guest rooms are provided, which is owned,
maintained, or operated by any person and which is kept, used, maintained, advertised or held
out to the public for hire which can be construed to be a hotel, motel, motor hotel, apartment
hotel, tourist court, resort, cabins, tourist home, bunkhouse, dormitory, or other similar place
by whatever name called, and includes all such accommodations operated for hire as lodging
establishments for either transient guests, permanent guests, or for both transient and
permanent guests;
[(5)] (8) "Owner", the person responsible for obtaining a license from the department
for operating the lodging establishment;
[(6)] (9) "Permanent guest", any person who rents and occupies a guest room in a
lodging establishment for a period of thirty-one days or more;
[(7)] (10) "Person", any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
organization, firm, or federal, state, county, city, village, or municipal association or
corporation;
(11) "Short-term rental property", residential or multifamily property used or
offered for rent for transient guest use through a hosting platform;
[(8)] (12) "Transient guest", any person who rents and occupies a guest room in a
lodging establishment for a period of less than thirty-one days.
315.085. 1. Every employee of a lodging establishment and every operator of a
short-term rental property in this state shall be required to receive human trafficking
awareness training within one-hundred-eighty days of employment or the first listing of
a short-term rental property on a hosting platform, and after the first year of

HB 1678 3
employment or listing, annual human trafficking awareness training not later than
December thirty-first.
2. Every operator of a lodging establishment or short-term rental property in
this state shall implement procedures and adopt policies for the reporting of suspected
human trafficking to the national human trafficking hotline or to a local law
enforcement agency.
3. Any person who operates a lodging establishment or short-term rental
property shall maintain records of employee or operator training. Such records shall be
kept on file by the operator of the lodging establishment or short-term rental property
for the period during which the employee is employed by the establishment or the
operator manages the short-term rental property listing, and for one year after such
employment or operation ends. A lodging establishment or short-term rental property
operator shall provide records to the department within a reasonable amount of time,
but no later than ten business days, after such request is made in writing.
✔